Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 4. Alaska Workforce Investment Board.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 86, SLA 2002 (HCS CSSB 252(FIN)), see 2002 Senate Journal 2003 - 2004.

Sec. 23.15.550.
Alaska Workforce Investment Board.

The Alaska Workforce Investment Board is established in the department. The board consists of the following voting members, not to exceed 26:

the lieutenant governor or the lieutenant governor’s designee;

the commissioners of commerce, community, and economic development, education and early development, health and social services, and labor and workforce development, or each respective commissioner’s designee;

one representative from the University of Alaska;

four additional representatives of education, with one from local public education, one from secondary vocational education, one from a postsecondary vocational education institution, and one from adult basic education;

four representatives of business and industry;

four representatives of organized labor whom the governor shall appoint from lists of nominees submitted by recognized state labor organizations; the governor may reject a list submitted under this paragraph and request that another list be submitted;

at least one representative from an organization representing employment and training needs of Alaska Natives;

at least one representative of a community-based service organization;

at least one representative who has personal or professional experience with developmental disabilities;

at least one veteran; in this paragraph, “veteran” has the meaning given in AS

43.20.048(f)

;

at least one and up to four additional members of the private sector to ensure a private sector majority and regional and local representation on the board.

Additional nonvoting members may be appointed to the board from government or nongovernment entities.

A member of the board under (a) of this section may appoint a designee to serve in place of the member. The member shall appoint the designee in writing.

History.

(§ 23 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 86 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 49 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (a)(2) of this section, “community and economic development” was changed to “commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions relating to members of the former Alaska Human Resources Investment Council serving as the members of the Alaska Workforce Investment Board and to the executive director of the former council serving as the executive director of the board under the 2002 amendment of this section, see § 50, ch. 86, SLA 2002, in the 2002 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective August 31, 2015, in (a), added (a)(10), redesignated existing (a)(10) as (a)(11) and in (a)(11) substituted “four” for “five”; made related changes.

Sec. 23.15.555.
Appointment and term of members.

Members of the Alaska Workforce Investment Board other than those listed in AS

23.15.550(a)(1)

and (2) are appointed by the governor and serve at the pleasure of the governor. The governor may appoint one person to fill two or more of the places listed in AS

23.15.550(a)

if the person is qualified in all of the areas the person represents. A member appointed to fill more than one place under this subsection is entitled to only one vote and may appoint only one designee to replace the member in the event the member is unable to attend a meeting.

The voting members of the board other than those listed in AS

23.15.550(a)(1)

and (2) serve for staggered four-year terms and may serve until a successor is appointed. An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be made in the same manner as the original appointment and for the balance of the unexpired term.

The governor shall ensure that individuals appointed to the board have sufficient expertise to effectively carry out the duties of the board. Expertise of the board includes, where appropriate, knowledge of the long-term needs of individuals preparing to enter the work force; the needs of local, state, and regional labor markets; and the methods for evaluating the effectiveness of vocational training programs in serving varying populations.

History.

(§ 23 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 4 ch 86 SLA 2002)

Sec. 23.15.560.
Compensation.

Members of the Alaska Workforce Investment Board listed in or appointed under AS

23.15.550(a)

, including a designee of a member attending in place of the member, serve without compensation but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

. Nonvoting members of the board appointed under AS

23.15.550(b)

serve without compensation and are not entitled to per diem and travel expenses. A commissioner appointed under AS

23.15.550(a)

(2) or the commissioner’s designee is entitled to per diem and travel expenses as a state employee.

History.

(§ 23 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 5 ch 86 SLA 2002)

Sec. 23.15.565.
Officers.

The Alaska Workforce Investment Board shall elect a chair and a vice-chair from among the members listed in or appointed under AS

23.15.550(a)(5)

. The chair and vice-chair serve in their positions at the pleasure of the board.

History.

(§ 23 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 6 ch 86 SLA 2002)

Sec. 23.15.570.
Meetings, quorum, and committees.

The Alaska Workforce Investment Board shall meet not more than three times in a calendar year at the call of the chair to conduct its business. A majority of the members listed in or appointed to the board under AS

23.15.550(a)

constitutes a quorum.

The board shall establish an executive committee and four permanent standing committees as described in (c) — (g) of this section. The chair of a permanent standing committee must be from the private sector. The board may establish additional standing committees and special committees or subcommittees, not necessarily consisting of board members, to advise and assist the board in carrying out its functions assigned by federal or state statute. The permanent standing committees are

the assessment and evaluation committee;

the policy and planning committee;

the employment and placement committee; and

the workforce readiness committee.

The executive committee consists of the chair and vice-chair of the board, the immediate past chair of the board, and the chairs of the four standing committees described in (d) — (g) of this section. The executive committee has the duties and may exercise the powers of the council between meetings of the board. The executive committee shall

report to the board in a timely fashion on actions taken on behalf of the board; and

supervise the affairs of the board between regular meetings of the board.

The assessment and evaluation committee shall

assess and evaluate programs, initiatives, and the delivery of services to help to ensure equitable distribution of quality education, training, and employment services statewide, especially to rural areas and to programs serving economically disadvantaged citizens;

call for and monitor the workforce development system for increased accountability in performance and continuous quality improvement along the goals and strategies of the board’s overall statewide strategic plan for workforce development;

use evaluation and performance measures to gauge customer satisfaction within the workforce development system; and

perform other duties assigned by the board.

The policy and planning committee shall

build policies regarding day-to-day operations and long-term responsibilities of the board;

work to increase awareness of the board and its mission throughout the state;

work with all other committees on a statewide strategic plan for workforce development; and

perform other duties assigned by the board.

The employment and placement committee shall

ensure the statewide strategic plan for workforce development addresses

customer needs at the local level;

moving welfare recipients into the workforce;

promoting the hiring of state residents in jobs that have traditionally been filled by out-of-state workers;

tailoring employment and training programs to suit state business, industry, and economic development needs;

monitor the coordination of service delivery to promote efficiency and to prevent overlap of services among programs; and

perform other duties assigned by the board.

The workforce readiness committee shall

provide oversight for training, education, and employment programs to ensure the programs are delivering education and training that is relevant to local market needs and the career goals of state residents;

build partnerships between employers and quality workforce training programs;

work to connect the state public and private education systems with business, government, and labor to ensure that state residents are receiving workforce readiness skills throughout the education process; and

perform other duties assigned by the board.

History.

(§ 23 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 7 ch 86 SLA 2002)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter on ch. 86, SLA 2002 (HCS CSSB 252(FIN)), see 2002 Senate Journal 2003 — 2004.

Sec. 23.15.575.
Board as state planning entity.

The Alaska Workforce Investment Board shall act as the lead state planning and coordinating entity for state human resource programs administered under

29 U.S.C. 2801 — 2945 (Workforce Investment Act of 1998);

20 U.S.C. 2301 — 2471 (Carl D. Perkins Vocational and Applied Technology Education Act);

29 U.S.C. 49 — 49l-1 (Wagner — Peyser Act);

federal law for work programs for needy families with children under the Social Security Act;

the employment program established under 7 U.S.C. 2015(d)(4) (Food Stamp Act of 1977);

all federal programs designated as successors to the programs listed in (1) — (5) of this section; and

all state laws involving employment training, vocational education, and workforce development.

History.

(§ 23 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 8 ch 86 SLA 2002)

Sec. 23.15.580.
Functions of the board.

As the lead state planning and coordinating entity, the Alaska Workforce Investment Board has responsibility, to the extent authorized by federal and state law, for planning and coordinating federal, state, and local efforts in human resource programs in this state related to employment training, including the work activities of the Alaska temporary assistance program under AS 47.27.

The board shall

facilitate the development of statewide policy for a coordinated and effective employment training and education system in this state;

identify the human resource investment needs in the state and develop a plan to meet those needs;

review the provision of services and the use of money and resources by the human resource programs listed in AS

23.15.575

;

assume the duties and functions of the state boards described under the laws relating to the federal human resource programs listed in AS

23.15.575

;

advise the governor, state and local agencies, the University of Alaska, and other training entities on the development of state and local standards and measures relating to applicable human resource programs;

submit, to the governor and the legislature, a biennial strategic plan to accomplish the goals developed to meet human resource investment needs;

monitor for the implementation and evaluate the effectiveness of the strategic plan developed by the board;

adopt regulations that set standards for the percentage of program expenses that may be used for administrative costs; the regulations must clearly identify and distinguish between program expenses that may be included in administrative costs and those that may not be included in administrative costs; the percentage allowed for administrative costs may not exceed the lesser of 20 percent of program expenses in the prior fiscal year or the amount permitted under the requirements of a federal program, if applicable;

report annually to the legislature, by the 30th day of the regular legislative session, on the performance and evaluation of training programs in the state subject to review under (f) of this section;

identify ways for agencies operating programs subject to oversight by the board to share resources, instructors, and curricula through collaboration with other public and private entities to increase training opportunities and reduce costs;

adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to carry out the purposes of AS

23.15.550

—

23.15.585

; and

perform duties assigned in AS

23.15.620

—

23.15.660

for the state training and employment program.

The board may receive money designated for human resource programs and may disburse money, including grants, to human resource projects in accordance with AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act). The board may enter into partnership agreements through appropriate administrative agencies with private industry training entities within the state in order to facilitate the coordination of training opportunities.

The board shall provide oversight for the planning and coordination of employment-related education training programs operated by the state or operated under contract with the state that are described in (f) of this section. The board shall require a training program listed in (f) of this section to meet the requirements of this subsection. The board shall, by regulation, establish appropriate penalties for programs that fail to meet the requirements of this subsection. The board may recommend to the legislature changes to enhance the effectiveness of the training programs it oversees under this section. A training program described in (f) of this section funded with money appropriated by the legislature must

meet the standards adopted by the board concerning the percentage of a grant that may be spent on administrative costs;

be operated by an institution that holds a valid authorization to operate issued under AS 14.48 by the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education if the program is a postsecondary educational program operated by a postsecondary educational institution subject to regulation under AS 14.48;

provide to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development the information required by the department for the preparation of the statistical information necessary for the board to evaluate programs by the standards set out in (e) of this section.

The board shall develop standards that encourage agencies to contract for training programs that meet local demands and maximize the use of resources. The board shall adopt standards for the evaluation of training programs listed in (f) of this section with regard to the following:

the percentage of former participants who have a job one year after leaving the training program;

the median wage of former participants seven to 12 months after leaving the program;

the percentage of former participants who were employed after leaving the training program who received training under the program that was related to their jobs or somewhat related to their jobs seven to 12 months after leaving the training program;

the percentage of former participants of a training program who indicate that they were satisfied with or somewhat satisfied with the overall quality of the training program;

the percentage of employers who indicate that they were satisfied with the services received through the workforce development system.

The following training programs are subject to the provisions of (d) and (e) of this section:

in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development or operated by the department:

programs under 29 U.S.C. 2801 — 2945 (Workforce Investment Act of 1998), assisting communities in moving toward a self-sustainable economy and providing training;

the state training and employment program under AS

23.15.620

—

23.15.660

;

employment-related adult basic education;

employment training services operated as part of the Alaska temporary assistance program (ATAP);

unemployment insurance grants provided under the federal training relocation assistance program;

Alaska works programs, assisting with the welfare-to-work program;

Kotzebue Technical Center;

Alaska Vocational Technical Center;

in the Department of Education and Early Development or operated by the department, the non-public-school portions of the

vocational education and technical preparation program; and

Alaska Career Information System.

The board shall assess the programs listed in this subsection and make recommendations to the legislature in its report required under (b)(9) of this section about whether to include one or more of these programs under the requirements of (f) of this section:

in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development or operated by the department:

local government assistance training and development, including the rural utility business advisory program;

energy operations, providing training in management and administration of electric utilities and bulk fuel storage systems;

in the Department of Corrections:

Correctional Academy, training individuals applying for a correctional officer position;

inmate programs, providing vocational technical training and education courses for inmates preparing to be released from a correctional facility;

employment of prison inmates, providing inmates with jobs while they are incarcerated;

in the Department of Environmental Conservation:

remote maintenance worker program, providing training and technical assistance to communities to keep drinking water and sewage disposal systems running, and providing on-the-job training to local operators;

water and wastewater operator training and assistance;

federal drinking water operator training and certification;

in the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs: educational benefits for members of the Alaska National Guard and the Alaska Naval Militia;

in the Department of Public Safety:

fire service training to maintain emergency training skills for existing firefighter staff and volunteers and individuals interested in becoming firefighters;

Public Safety Training Academy, training trooper recruits;

in the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities:

engineer-in-training program, providing on-the-job training for apprentice engineers to enable them to gain the experience necessary to be certified;

statewide transportation improvement program, offered by the United States National Highway Institute;

local technical assistance program, transferring technical expertise to local governments;

Native technical assistance program, transferring technical expertise to Native governments;

border technology exchange program, to coordinate highway issues with the Yukon Territory;

in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development: vocational rehabilitation client services and special work projects, employment services, including job development, assisting individuals in finding employment, and assisting employed individuals in finding other employment.

The University of Alaska shall evaluate the performance of its training programs using the standards set out in (e) of this section and shall provide a report on the results to the board for inclusion in the board’s annual report to the legislature.

The board shall review each program listed in (f) of this section to determine whether it is in compliance with the standards set out in (d) and (e) of this section. If the board finds that a program has failed to comply with the standards set out in (d) and (e) of this section, it shall notify the program director of the failure. If the program director fails to improve the performance of the program within a reasonable time, the board shall notify the governor and the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee that the program is out of compliance. A contract entered into by a state agency relating to a training program set out in (f) of this section must contain terms consistent with this section.

A department that operates or contracts for a training program listed in (f) of this section shall pay to the board a management assessment fee not to exceed .75 percent of the program’s annual operating budget. The total amount received as management assessment fees may not exceed the board’s authorized budget for the fiscal year. The board shall, by regulation, establish a method to determine annually the amount of the management assessment fee. If the amount the board expects to collect under this subsection exceeds the authorized budget of the board, the board shall reduce the percentages set out in this subsection so that the total amount of the fees collected approximately equals the authorized budget of the board for the fiscal year. The board shall adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary to administer this subsection.

Upon the enactment of a new federal or state program relating to work force development, the board shall

advise the governor and the legislature on whether the board should provide oversight for the new program under this section; and

make recommendations necessary to streamline and coordinate state efforts to meet the guidelines of the new program.

For purposes of this section, “program”

does not refer to the overall activities of an individual institution or individual fields of study or courses that are not associated with programs for which the board has oversight responsibility;

may include a certificate or associate degree course or a course that is not for credit, whether it is offered by a public or private institute or contracted for by the private sector, so long as it is related to employment.

History.

(§ 23 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 9 ch 86 SLA 2002; am § 3 ch 49 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 2006; am §§ 1, 2 ch 36 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (g) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska workforce investment board, see 8 AAC 84.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, added (b)(12) and made related stylistic changes; and rewrote (f)(1)(B), which read, “state training and employment program (AS

23.15.620

), providing training and employment services for people who are unemployed or likely to become unemployed, fostering new jobs, and increasing training opportunities for workers severely affected by fluctuations in the state economy or adversely affected by technology advances in the workplace”.

Sec. 23.15.585.
Administration.

The governor shall appoint the executive director for the Alaska Workforce Investment Board. The department shall provide professional, technical, and administrative staff for the Alaska Workforce Investment Board.

Subject to legislative appropriations, and in accordance with AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act), the board’s budget is funded from programs for which the board is the lead state planning and coordinating entity under AS

23.15.575

.

History.

(§ 23 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 10 ch 86 SLA 2002)

Sec. 23.15.610.
Participation in Manpower Development and Training Act. [Repealed, § 1 ch 103 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 23.15.611.
Department participation in manpower training programs.

[Repealed, § 84 ch 58 SLA 1999.]

.

Sec. 23.15.614.
Manpower training division. [Repealed, § 84 ch 58 SLA 1999.]

Sec. 23.15.617.
Manpower Training Advisory Council. [Repealed, § 2 ch 174 SLA 1975.]